Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.620

Computation of the retirement allowance.

A member of the retirement system shall receive a retirement allowance equal to two percent of such member's average final compensation for each service credit year of service.

[ 1991 c 343 s 10; 1977 ex.s. c 295 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Effective dates—1991 c 343: See notes following RCW 41.50.005.

Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 295: See notes following RCW 41.40.610.